Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2632
Registration; denial or change in status; grounds; procedure.

(1) The department may deny an application for registration of a pesticide under the Pesticide Act or may cancel, suspend, or modify such registration if the department finds that:

(a) The composition of the pesticide does not warrant the proposed claims made for it;

(b) The pesticide, its labeling, or other materials required to be submitted do not comply with the requirements of the Pesticide Act; or

(c) The department has reason to believe that any use of a registered pesticide is in violation of a provision of the Pesticide Act or the federal act or is dangerous or harmful.

(2) The department shall issue written notice of its denial, cancellation, suspension, or modification and shall give such registrant or applicant an opportunity to make necessary corrections or to have a hearing pursuant to the procedure in section 2-2649.02.

(3) After an opportunity at a hearing for presentation of evidence by interested parties, the department may deny, cancel, suspend, or modify the registration of the pesticide if the department finds that:

(a) Use of the pesticide has demonstrated uncontrollable adverse environmental effects;

(b) Use of the pesticide is a detriment to the environment that outweighs the benefits derived from its use;

(c) Even if properly used, the pesticide is detrimental to vegetation except weeds, to domestic animals, or to public health and safety;

(d) A false or misleading statement about the pesticide has been made or implied by the registrant or the registrant's agent, in writing, verbally, or through any form of advertising literature;

(e) The registrant has not complied or the pesticide or its labeling or submitted material does not comply with a requirement of the Pesticide Act, the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, or the federal act; or

(f) The composition of the pesticide does not warrant the proposed claims made for it.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 11;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 6.